Missouri, session 2026, HB3130.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 1.410, 1.420, 1.430, 1.440, 1.450, 1.460, 1.470, 1.480, and 1.485,
RSMo, are repealed and six new sections enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as sections
1.411, 1.451, 1.461, 1.471, 1.481, and 1.484, to read as follows:
1.411. 1. Sections 1.411 to 1.484 shall be known and may be cited as the "Pretti-
Good Act".
2. The general assembly finds and declares that:
(1) The general assembly of the state of Missouri is firmly resolved to support
and defend the Constitution of the United States against every aggression, whether
foreign or domestic, and is duty bound to oppose every infraction of those principles
that constitute the basis of the union of the states because only a faithful observance of
those principles can secure the Union's existence and the public happiness;
(2) Acting through the Constitution of the United States, the people of the
several states created the federal government to be their agent in the exercise of a few
defined powers, while reserving for the state governments the power to legislate on
matters concerning the lives, liberties, and properties of citizens in the ordinary course
of affairs;
(3) The limitation of the federal government's power is affirmed under
Amendment X of the Constitution of the United States, which defines the total scope of
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 3130 2
federal powers as being those that have been delegated by the people of the several states
to the federal government and all powers not delegated to the federal government in the
Constitution of the United States are reserved to the states respectively or the people
themselves;
(4) If the federal government assumes powers that the people did not grant it in
the Constitution of the United States, its acts are unauthoritative, void, and of no force;
(5) The several states of the United States respect the proper role of the federal
government but reject the proposition that such respect requires unlimited submission.
If the federal government, created by a compact among the states, were the exclusive or
final judge of the extent of the powers granted to it by the states through the
Constitution of the United States, the federal government's discretion, and not the
Constitution of the United States, would necessarily become the measure of those
powers. To the contrary, as in all other cases of compacts among powers having no
common judge, each party has an equal right to judge for itself as to whether infractions
of the compact have occurred, as well as to determine the mode and measure of redress.
Although the several states have granted supremacy to laws and treaties made under the
powers granted in the Constitution of the United States, such supremacy does not extend
to various federal statutes, executive orders, administrative orders, court orders, rules,
regulations, or other actions that collect data or restrict or prohibit the manufacture,
ownership, or use of firearms, firearm accessories, or ammunition exclusively within the
borders of Missouri. Such statutes, executive orders, administrative orders, court
orders, rules, regulations, and other actions exceed the powers granted to the federal
government except to the extent they are necessary and proper for governing and
regulating the Armed Forces of the United States or for organizing, arming, and
disciplining militia forces actively employed in the service of the Armed Forces of the
United States;
(6) The several states of the United States respect the proper role of peace
officers and federal law enforcement agents working in the state of Missouri but reject
the proposition that such respect requires a forfeiture of constitutional rights. The
preservation of liberty and security of the people requires transparency and
accountability in the exercise of police powers. The use of anonymity or facial
concealment by peace officers and other law enforcement agents undermines a law-
abiding citizen's ability to assess the legality of searches and seizures and seek redress
for unlawful conduct and is therefore antithetical to the right to be secure in one's
person and effects as ensured by Amendment IV of the Constitution of the United States.
Therefore, any peace officer, law enforcement agent, or person acting under the color of
law within this state shall, in every public interaction, clearly and promptly identify

HB 3130 3
himself or herself and the authority under which he or she acts. Peace officers, law
enforcement agents, or persons acting under the color of law within this state shall not
obscure or conceal their faces by masks or other facial coverings except where strictly
necessary for immediate safety in exigent circumstances as described in section 563.026;
(7) Although the several states have granted supremacy to laws and treaties
made under the powers granted in the Constitution of the United States, such
supremacy does not extend to various federal statutes, executive orders, administrative
orders, court orders, rules, regulations, or other actions that require or allow the use of
facial coverings by peace officers or law enforcement acting within the borders of
Missouri or that allow peace officers or law enforcement officers acting within the
borders of Missouri to refuse to identify themselves and the authority under which they
act. Such statutes, executive orders, administrative orders, court orders, rules,
regulations, and other actions exceed the powers granted to the federal government
except to the extent they are necessary and proper for governing and regulating the
Armed Forces of the United States or for organizing, arming, and disciplining militia
forces actively employed in the service of the Armed Forces of the United States;
(8) The people of the several states have given Congress the power "to regulate
commerce with foreign nations, and among the several states", but "regulating
commerce" does not include the power to limit citizens' rights to keep and bear arms in
defense of their families, neighbors, persons, or property and to be secure in their
persons and effects against unreasonable searches and seizures nor to dictate what sorts
of arms and accessories law-abiding Missourians may buy, sell, exchange, or otherwise
possess within the borders of this state;
(9) The people of the several states have also granted Congress the powers "to
lay and collect taxes, duties, imports, and excises, to pay the debts, and provide for the
common defense and general welfare of the United States" and "to make all laws which
shall be necessary and proper for carrying into execution the powers vested by the
Constitution of the United States in the government of the United States, or in any
department or office thereof". These constitutional provisions merely identify the
means by which the federal government may execute its limited powers and shall not be
construed to grant unlimited power because to do so would be to destroy the carefully
constructed equilibrium between the federal and state governments. Consequently, the
general assembly rejects any claim that the taxing and spending powers of Congress
may be used to diminish in any way the rights of the people to keep and bear arms and
be secure in their persons and effects against unreasonable searches and seizures;

HB 3130 4
(10) The federal excise tax rate on arms and ammunition in effect prior to
January 1, 2026, which funds programs under the Wildlife Restoration Act, does not
have a chilling effect on the purchase or ownership of such arms and ammunition;
(11) The people of Missouri have vested the general assembly with the authority
to regulate police powers and the manufacture, possession, exchange, and use of
firearms within the borders of this state, subject only to the limits imposed by
Amendments II and IV of the Constitution of the United States and the Constitution of
Missouri; and
(12) The general assembly of the state of Missouri strongly promotes responsible
gun ownership, including parental supervision of minors in the proper use, storage, and
ownership of all firearms; the prompt reporting of stolen firearms; and the proper
enforcement of all state gun laws. The general assembly of the state of Missouri hereby
100 condemns any unlawful transfer of firearms and the use of any firearm in any criminal
101 or unlawful activity.
1.451. No public officer or employee of this state or any political subdivision of
this state shall have the authority to enforce or attempt to enforce against law-abiding
citizens any federal acts, laws, executive orders, administrative orders, rules,
regulations, statutes, or ordinances that regulate firearms, firearm accessories, or
ammunition or that require or allow peace officers or law enforcement officers acting
within the borders of this state to use facial coverings or refuse to identify themselves or
the authority under which they act. Nothing in sections 1.451 to 1.484 shall be construed
to prohibit Missouri officials from accepting aid from federal officials in an effort to
enforce Missouri laws.
1.461. 1. Any political subdivision or law enforcement agency that employs a
law enforcement officer who acts knowingly, as defined under section 562.016, to violate
the provisions of section 1.451 or otherwise knowingly deprives a citizen of Missouri of
the rights or privileges ensured by Amendment II or IV of the Constitution of the United
States or Article I, Section 15 or 23 of the Constitution of Missouri while acting under
the color of any state or federal law shall be liable to the injured party in an action at
law, suit in equity, or other proper proceeding for redress, and subject to a civil penalty
of fifty thousand dollars per occurrence. Any person injured under this section shall
have standing to pursue an action for injunctive relief in the circuit court of the county
in which the action allegedly occurred or in the circuit court of Cole County with respect
to the actions of such individual. The court shall hold a hearing on the motion for a
temporary restraining order and preliminary injunction within thirty days of service of
the petition.

HB 3130 5
2. In such actions, the court may award the prevailing party, other than the state
of Missouri or any political subdivision of the state, reasonable attorney's fees and costs.
3. Sovereign immunity shall not be an affirmative defense in any action pursuant
to this section.
1.471. 1. Any political subdivision or law enforcement agency that knowingly
employs an individual acting or who previously acted as an official, agent, employee, or
deputy of the government of the United States, or otherwise acted under the color of
federal law within the borders of this state, who has knowingly, as defined under section
562.016, after the adoption of this section:
(1) Enforced, attempted to enforce, or participated in any way in the
enforcement or implementation of any federal acts, laws, executive orders, rules,
regulations, statutes, or ordinances that regulate firearms, firearm accessories, or
ammunition or that require or allow peace officers or law enforcement officers acting
within the borders of this state to use facial coverings or refuse to identify themselves or
the authority under which they act; or
(2) Given material aid and support to the efforts of another who enforces or
attempts to enforce or participates in any way in the enforcement or implementation of
any federal acts, laws, executive orders, rules, regulations, statutes, or ordinances that
regulate firearms, firearm accessories, or ammunition or that require or allow peace
officers or law enforcement officers acting within the borders of this state to use facial
coverings or refuse to identify themselves or the authority under which they act

shall be subject to a civil penalty of fifty thousand dollars per employee hired by the
political subdivision or law enforcement agency involved in a course of conduct
described in subdivision (1) or (2) of this subsection. Each such course of conduct shall
subject the political subdivision or law enforcement agency to a separate civil penalty.
Any person residing in a jurisdiction who believes that an individual has taken action
that would violate the provisions of this section shall have standing to pursue an action,
but multiple actions relating to the same course of conduct shall not subject the political
subdivision or law enforcement agency to penalties that total more than fifty thousand
dollars for each employee involved in the course of conduct.
2. Any person residing or conducting business in a jurisdiction who believes that
an individual has taken action that would violate the provisions of this section shall have
standing to pursue an action for injunctive relief in the circuit court of the county in
which the action allegedly occurred or in the circuit court of Cole County with respect to
the actions of such individual. The court shall hold a hearing on the motion for a

HB 3130 6
temporary restraining order and preliminary injunction within thirty days of service of
the petition.
3. In such actions, the court may award the prevailing party, other than the state
of Missouri or any political subdivision of the state, reasonable attorney's fees and costs.
4. Sovereign immunity shall not be an affirmative defense in any action pursuant
to this section.
5. Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit the hiring, or impose any
penalties for the hiring, of any individual whose federal service was as a member of the
Armed Forces of the United States.
1.481. 1. As used in sections 1.451 to 1.484, the term "law-abiding citizen"
means:
(1) For the right to keep and bear arms, a person who is not otherwise precluded
under state law from possessing a firearm and shall not be construed to include anyone
who is not legally present in the United States or the state of Missouri; and
(2) For the right to be secure in one's persons and effects against unreasonable
searches and seizures, a person who is entitled to protection under Amendment IV of the
Constitution of the United States in the context in which the term is used.
2. As used in sections 1.451 to 1.484, "material aid and support" shall include
voluntarily giving or allowing others to make use of lodging; communications
equipment or services, including social media accounts; facilities; weapons;
personnel; transportation; clothing; or other physical assets. Material aid and
support shall not include giving or allowing the use of medicine or other materials
necessary to treat physical injuries, nor shall the term include any assistance provided to
help persons escape a serious, present risk of life-threatening injury.
3. It shall not be considered a violation of sections 1.451 to 1.484 to provide
material aid to federal officials who are in pursuit of a suspect when there is a
demonstrable criminal nexus with another state or country and such suspect is either
not a citizen of this state or is not present in this state.
4. It shall not be considered a violation of sections 1.451 to 1.484 to provide
material aid to federal prosecution for:
(1) Felony crimes against a person when such prosecution includes weapons
violations substantially similar to those found in chapter 570 or 571 so long as such
weapons violations are merely ancillary to such prosecution; or
(2) Class A or class B felony violations substantially similar to those found in
chapter 579 when such prosecution includes weapons violations substantially similar to
those found in chapter 570 or 571 so long as such weapons violations are merely
ancillary to such prosecution.

HB 3130 7
5. The provisions of sections 1.451 to 1.484 shall be applicable to offenses
occurring on or after August 28, 2026.
1.484. If any provision of sections 1.411 to 1.484 or the application thereof to any
person or circumstance is held invalid, such determination shall not affect the provisions
or applications of sections 1.411 to 1.484 that may be given effect without the invalid
provision or application, and the provisions of sections 1.411 to 1.484 are severable.
[1.410. 1. Sections 1.410 to 1.485 shall be known and may be cited as
the "Second Amendment Preservation Act".
2. The general assembly finds and declares that:
(1) The general assembly of the state of Missouri is firmly resolved to
support and defend the Constitution of the United States against every
aggression, whether foreign or domestic, and is duty-bound to oppose every
infraction of those principles that constitute the basis of the union of the states
because only a faithful observance of those principles can secure the union's
existence and the public happiness;
(2) Acting through the Constitution of the United States, the people of
the several states created the federal government to be their agent in the
exercise of a few defined powers, while reserving for the state governments
the power to legislate on matters concerning the lives, liberties, and properties
of citizens in the ordinary course of affairs;
(3) The limitation of the federal government's power is affirmed under
Amendment X of the Constitution of the United States, which defines the total
scope of federal powers as being those that have been delegated by the people
of the several states to the federal government and all powers not delegated to
the federal government in the Constitution of the United States are reserved to
the states respectively or the people themselves;
(4) If the federal government assumes powers that the people did not
grant it in the Constitution of the United States, its acts are unauthoritative,
void, and of no force;
(5) The several states of the United States respect the proper role of the
federal government but reject the proposition that such respect requires
unlimited submission. If the federal government, created by a compact among
the states, were the exclusive or final judge of the extent of the powers granted
to it by the states through the Constitution of the United States, the federal
government's discretion, and not the Constitution of the United States, would
necessarily become the measure of those powers. To the contrary, as in all
other cases of compacts among powers having no common judge, each party
has an equal right to judge for itself as to whether infractions of the compact
have occurred, as well as to determine the mode and measure of redress.
Although the several states have granted supremacy to laws and treaties made
under the powers granted in the Constitution of the United States, such
supremacy does not extend to various federal statutes, executive orders,
administrative orders, court orders, rules, regulations, or other actions that
collect data or restrict or prohibit the manufacture, ownership, or use of
firearms, firearm accessories, or ammunition exclusively within the borders of
Missouri; such statutes, executive orders, administrative orders, court orders,

HB 3130 8
rules, regulations, and other actions exceed the powers granted to the federal
government except to the extent they are necessary and proper for governing
and regulating the United States Armed Forces or for organizing, arming, and
disciplining militia forces actively employed in the service of the United States
Armed Forces;
(6) The people of the several states have given Congress the power "to
regulate commerce with foreign nations, and among the several states", but
"regulating commerce" does not include the power to limit citizens' right to
keep and bear arms in defense of their families, neighbors, persons, or property
nor to dictate what sorts of arms and accessories law-abiding Missourians may
buy, sell, exchange, or otherwise possess within the borders of this state;
(7) The people of the several states have also granted Congress the
powers "to lay and collect taxes, duties, imports, and excises, to pay the debts,
and provide for the common defense and general welfare of the United States"
and "to make all laws which shall be necessary and proper for carrying into
execution the powers vested by the Constitution of the United States in the
government of the United States, or in any department or office thereof".
These constitutional provisions merely identify the means by which the federal
government may execute its limited powers and shall not be construed to grant
unlimited power because to do so would be to destroy the carefully
constructed equilibrium between the federal and state governments.
Consequently, the general assembly rejects any claim that the taxing and
spending powers of Congress may be used to diminish in any way the right of
the people to keep and bear arms;
(8) The general assembly finds that the federal excise tax rate on arms
and ammunition in effect prior to January 1, 2021, which funds programs
under the Wildlife Restoration Act, does not have a chilling effect on the
purchase or ownership of such arms and ammunition;
(9) The people of Missouri have vested the general assembly with the
authority to regulate the manufacture, possession, exchange, and use of
firearms within the borders of this state, subject only to the limits imposed by
Amendment II of the Constitution of the United States and the Constitution of
Missouri; and
(10) The general assembly of the state of Missouri strongly promotes
responsible gun ownership, including parental supervision of minors in the
proper use, storage, and ownership of all firearms; the prompt reporting of
stolen firearms; and the proper enforcement of all state gun laws. The general
assembly of the state of Missouri hereby condemns any unlawful transfer of
firearms and the use of any firearm in any criminal or unlawful activity.]
[1.420. The following federal acts, laws, executive orders,
administrative orders, rules, and regulations shall be considered
infringements on the people's right to keep and bear arms, as guaranteed by
Amendment II of the Constitution of the United States and Article I, Section
23 of the Constitution of Missouri, within the borders of this state including,
but not limited to:
(1) Any tax, levy, fee, or stamp imposed on firearms, firearm
accessories, or ammunition not common to all other goods and services and

HB 3130 9
that might reasonably be expected to create a chilling effect on the purchase or
ownership of those items by law-abiding citizens;
(2) Any registration or tracking of firearms, firearm accessories, or
ammunition;
(3) Any registration or tracking of the ownership of firearms, firearm
accessories, or ammunition;
(4) Any act forbidding the possession, ownership, use, or transfer of a
firearm, firearm accessory, or ammunition by law-abiding citizens; and
(5) Any act ordering the confiscation of firearms, firearm accessories,
or ammunition from law-abiding citizens.]
[1.430. All federal acts, laws, executive orders, administrative orders,
rules, and regulations, regardless of whether they were enacted before or after
the provisions of sections 1.410 to 1.485, that infringe on the people's right to
keep and bear arms as guaranteed by the Second Amendment to the
Constitution of the United States and Article I, Section 23 of the Constitution
of Missouri shall be invalid to this state, shall not be recognized by this state,
shall be specifically rejected by this state, and shall not be enforced by this
state.]
[1.440. It shall be the duty of the courts and law enforcement agencies
of this state to protect the rights of law-abiding citizens to keep and bear arms
within the borders of this state and to protect these rights from the
infringements defined under section 1.420.]
[1.450. No entity or person, including any public officer or employee
of this state or any political subdivision of this state, shall have the authority to
enforce or attempt to enforce any federal acts, laws, executive orders,
administrative orders, rules, regulations, statutes, or ordinances infringing on
the right to keep and bear arms as described under section 1.420. Nothing in
sections 1.410 to 1.480 shall be construed to prohibit Missouri officials from
accepting aid from federal officials in an effort to enforce Missouri laws.]
[1.460. 1. Any political subdivision or law enforcement agency that
employs a law enforcement officer who acts knowingly, as defined under
section 562.016, to violate the provisions of section 1.450 or otherwise
knowingly deprives a citizen of Missouri of the rights or privileges ensured by
Amendment II of the Constitution of the United States or Article I, Section 23
of the Constitution of Missouri while acting under the color of any state or
federal law shall be liable to the injured party in an action at law, suit in equity,
or other proper proceeding for redress, and subject to a civil penalty of fifty
thousand dollars per occurrence. Any person injured under this section shall
have standing to pursue an action for injunctive relief in the circuit court of the
county in which the action allegedly occurred or in the circuit court of Cole
County with respect to the actions of such individual. The court shall hold a
hearing on the motion for temporary restraining order and preliminary
injunction within thirty days of service of the petition.

HB 3130 10
2. In such actions, the court may award the prevailing party, other than
the state of Missouri or any political subdivision of the state, reasonable
attorney's fees and costs.
3. Sovereign immunity shall not be an affirmative defense in any
action pursuant to this section.]
[1.470. 1. Any political subdivision or law enforcement agency that
knowingly employs an individual acting or who previously acted as an official,
agent, employee, or deputy of the government of the United States, or
otherwise acted under the color of federal law within the borders of this state,
who has knowingly, as defined under section 562.016, after the adoption of
this section:
(1) Enforced or attempted to enforce any of the infringements
identified in section 1.420; or
(2) Given material aid and support to the efforts of another who
enforces or attempts to enforce any of the infringements identified in section
1.420;

shall be subject to a civil penalty of fifty thousand dollars per employee hired
by the political subdivision or law enforcement agency. Any person residing
in a jurisdiction who believes that an individual has taken action that would
violate the provisions of this section shall have standing to pursue an action.
2. Any person residing or conducting business in a jurisdiction who
believes that an individual has taken action that would violate the provisions of
this section shall have standing to pursue an action for injunctive relief in the
circuit court of the county in which the action allegedly occurred or in the
circuit court of Cole County with respect to the actions of such individual.
The court shall hold a hearing on the motion for a temporary restraining order
and preliminary injunction within thirty days of service of the petition.
3. In such actions, the court may award the prevailing party, other than
the state of Missouri or any political subdivision of the state, reasonable
attorney's fees and costs.
4. Sovereign immunity shall not be an affirmative defense in any
action pursuant to this section.]
[1.480. 1. For sections 1.410 to 1.485, the term "law-abiding citizen"
shall mean a person who is not otherwise precluded under state law from
possessing a firearm and shall not be construed to include anyone who is not
legally present in the United States or the state of Missouri.
2. For the purposes of sections 1.410 to 1.480, "material aid and
support" shall include voluntarily giving or allowing others to make use of
lodging; communications equipment or services, including social media
accounts; facilities; weapons; personnel; transportation; clothing; or other
physical assets. Material aid and support shall not include giving or allowing
the use of medicine or other materials necessary to treat physical injuries, nor
shall the term include any assistance provided to help persons escape a serious,
present risk of life-threatening injury.

HB 3130 11
3. It shall not be considered a violation of sections 1.410 to 1.480 to
provide material aid to federal officials who are in pursuit of a suspect when
there is a demonstrable criminal nexus with another state or country and such
suspect is either not a citizen of this state or is not present in this state.
4. It shall not be considered a violation of sections 1.410 to 1.480 to
provide material aid to federal prosecution for:
(1) Felony crimes against a person when such prosecution includes
weapons violations substantially similar to those found in chapter 570 or 571
so long as such weapons violations are merely ancillary to such prosecution; or
(2) Class A or class B felony violations substantially similar to those
found in chapter 579 when such prosecution includes weapons violations
substantially similar to those found in chapter 570 or 571 so long as such
weapons violations are merely ancillary to such prosecution.
5. The provisions of sections 1.410 to 1.485 shall be applicable to
offenses occurring on or after August 28, 2021.]
[1.485. If any provision of sections 1.410 to 1.485 or the application
thereof to any person or circumstance is held invalid, such determination shall
not affect the provisions or applications of sections 1.410 to 1.485 that may be
given effect without the invalid provision or application, and the provisions of
sections 1.410 to 1.485 are severable.]
✔